Utah statutes.
7-1-207.   Supervisor of industrial banks -- Responsibilities.

(1)  The commissioner shall designate an examiner as supervisor of industrial banks who shall be sufficiently qualified by training and experience in the business of industrial banks or other financial institutions or as an employee of a state or federal agency supervising financial institutions to perform the duties of the office.

(2) (a)  The supervisor of industrial banks is responsible, subject to the direction and control of the commissioner, for the general supervision and examination of all industrial banks subject to the jurisdiction of the department and other institutions as assigned.

(b)  The supervisor shall:

(i)  assist and advise the commissioner in the execution of the laws of this state relating to these institutions; and

(ii)  perform other duties prescribed in this title or assigned by the commissioner.

